Washington statutes.
RCW 2.10.165

Refund of certain contributions.

If a judge who was a member of this system left the system before July 1, 1988, and neither the judge nor the judge's surviving spouse: (1) Was eligible at that time to receive a benefit under this chapter; or (2) has received an amount under a sundry claims appropriation from the state legislature intended as a refund of the judge's contributions paid under RCW 2.10.090(1); then the judge or the judge's surviving spouse may apply to the department for and receive a refund of such contributions.

[ 1991 c 159 s 1.]